Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-946.01
University of Nebraska-Lincoln; research; primary responsibility; other research activities.

The University of Nebraska-Lincoln shall be the primary public institution in the state for research. The research activities of the University of Nebraska at Omaha shall primarily support graduate programs and otherwise be directly related to the enhancement of the instructional programs and to the professional development of the faculty. The research activities of the University of Nebraska at Kearney shall be directly related to the enhancement of the instructional programs and to the professional development of the faculty. The research activities of the University of Nebraska Medical Center shall be health-related.

Laws 1991, LB 663, § 95.